Hawaii statutes.
§188-53 Fishing reserves, refuges, and
public fishing areas. (a) For the purposes of managing, preserving,
protecting, conserving, and propagating introduced freshwater fishes, and other
freshwater or marine life, the department of land and natural resources may
establish, maintain, manage, and operate freshwater or marine fishing reserves,
refuges, and public fishing areas in areas under its control as it may deem
desirable and may enter into agreements for the taking of control of privately
owned waters, lands, or fisheries for such purposes. The department may make,
adopt, and amend rules and may issue permits as it deems necessary for managing
the fishing reserves, refuges, public fishing areas, and other waters or lands
under the jurisdiction or control of the State.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to enter any
area established under this section without first obtaining a permit from the
department, if permits are required, or to violate any rule adopted by the
department governing same.

The department may revoke any permit for any
infraction of the terms and conditions of the permit. Any person whose permit
has been revoked shall not be eligible to apply for another permit until the
expiration of one year from the date of revocation. [L 1953, c 58, pt of §1; RL
1955, §21-86; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §188-53; am
L 1981, c 85, §60]

Cross References

Rulemaking procedure, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next